Missouri, session 2026, SB867.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 37.850, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 37.850,
to read as follows:
37.850. 1. The commissioner of administration shall
maintain the Missouri accountability portal established in
executive order 07-24 as a free, internet-based tool
allowing citizens to demand fiscal discipline and
responsibility.
2. The Missouri accountability portal shall consist of
an easy-to-search database of the following information:
(1) Financial transactions related to the purchase of
goods and services and the distribution of funds for state
programs;
(2) All bonds issued by any public institution of
higher education or political subdivision of this state or
its designated authority after August 28, 2013;
(3) All obligations issued or incurred pursuant to
section 99.820 by any political subdivision of this state or
its designated authority; [and]
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 867 2
(4) The revenue stream pledged to repay such bonds or
obligations; [and]
(5) All debt incurred by any public charter school; and
(6) The following financial information relating to
the Missouri empowerment scholarship accounts program
established in sections 135.712 to 135.719 and sections
166.700 to 166.720:
(a) The full name of the parent of each qualified
student for whom an empowerment scholarship account was
opened with each educational assistance organization;
(b) The total amount of money that has been awarded
from each educational assistance organization to each
parent's student, both by school year and the total
aggregate amount; and
(c) The total amount of money that has been remitted
from the empowerment scholarship account of each parent's
student to each qualified school, both by school year and
the total aggregate amount.
3. The Missouri accountability portal shall be updated
each state business day and maintained as the primary source
of information about the activity of Missouri's government.
4. Upon the conducting of a withholding or a release
of funds, the governor shall submit a report stating all
amounts withheld from the state's operating budget for the
current fiscal year, as authorized by Article IV, Section 27
of the Missouri Constitution which shall be:
(1) Conspicuously posted on the accountability portal
website;
(2) Searchable by the amounts withheld or released
from each individual fund; and
(3) Searchable by the total amount withheld or
released from the operating budget.

SB 867 3
5. Every political subdivision of the state, including
public institutions of higher education but excluding school
districts, shall supply all information described in
subsection 2 of this section to the office of administration
within seven days of issuing or incurring such corresponding
bond or obligation. For all such bonds or obligations
issued or incurred prior to August 28, 2013, every such
political subdivision and public institution of higher
education shall have ninety days to supply such information
to the office of administration.
6. Every school district and public charter school
shall supply all information described in subsection 2 of
this section to the department of elementary and secondary
education within seven days of issuing such bond, or
incurring such debt. The department of elementary and
secondary education shall have forty-eight hours to deliver
such information to the office of administration. For all
such bonds issued or debt incurred prior to August 28, 2013,
every school district and public charter school shall have
ninety days to supply such information to the department of
elementary and secondary education. The department of
elementary and secondary education shall have forty-eight
hours to deliver such information to the office of
administration.
7. Each educational assistance organization shall
supply all information described in subsection 2 of this
section to the state treasurer no later than July first and
January first of each year. The state treasurer shall have
forty-eight hours to deliver such information to the office
of administration.
✓